District of Columbia statutes.
32-1344

Penalties.

If the Commission on Human Rights finds that a violation of this subchapter has occurred, the commission shall impose the following penalties, of which half shall be awarded to the complainant:

(1)

For employers that employ 11 to 30 employees, a fine of up to $1,000;

(2)

For employers that employ 31 to 99 employees, a fine of up to $2,500; or

(3)

For employers that employ 100 or more employees, a fine of up to $5,000.

Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-152, § 5, 61 DCR 8904